tests/syntax/canon.sbl
// Test canonicalisation of commands.
externals (stem)
integers (x y)
define stem as (
  $x = cursor
  setmark y

  try 'a'

  atmark x
  $(cursor == y)

  atlimit
  $(cursor >= limit)
  not next
  not hop 1

  not atlimit
  not $(cursor >= limit)
  $(cursor < limit)
  test next
  test hop 1

  // `<-''` is the same as `delete`.
  // `hop 1` is the same as `next`
  [substring] among (
    'a' (delete next)
    'b' (<-''  hop 1)
  )

  $x > 0
  $x >= 1
  $(x > 0)
  $(0 < x)
  $(x >= 1)
  $(1 <= x)

  $y < 1
  $y <= 0
  $(y < 1)
  $(1 > y)
  $(y <= 0)
  $(0 >= y)

  $(x == y)
)
